Illinois, session 104th, HB351.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Methamphetamine Control and Community 5Protection Act is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 646/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act.9(Source: P.A. 94-556, eff. 9-11-05.)